North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 1. Generally.

§ 6-1.
Items allowed as costs.

To the party for whom judgment is given, costs shall be allowed as provided in Chapter 7A and this Chapter.

History.

Code, s. 528; Rev., s. 1249; C.S., s. 1225; 1955, c. 922; 1971, c. 269, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prosecution bonds for costs, see

G.S. 1-109

et seq.

As to partial recovery, see

G.S. 6-18

.

As to fees of witnesses, see

G.S. 6-51

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Legal Theory of Attorney Fee Shifting: A Critical Overview,” see 1982 Duke L.J. 651.

For article, “Mediation and the Elderly: Using Mediation to Resolve Probate Disputes Over Guardianship and Inheritance,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 397 (1997).

§ 6-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-3.
Sureties on prosecution bonds liable for costs.

When an action is brought in any court in which security is given for the prosecution thereof, or when any case is brought up to a court by an appeal or otherwise, in which security for the prosecution of the suit has been given, and judgment is rendered against the plaintiff for the costs of the defendant, the appellate court shall also give judgment against the surety for said costs, and execution may issue jointly against the plaintiff and his surety.

History.

1831, c. 46; R.S., c. 31, s. 133; R.C., c. 31, s. 126; Code, s. 543; Rev., s. 1251; 1913, c. 189, s. 1; C.S., s. 1227.

Cross References.

As to appeal bonds, see

G.S. 1-297

.

As to use of mortgages in lieu of security for costs, etc., see

G.S. 58-74-5

.

§ 6-4.
Execution for unpaid costs; bill of costs to be attached.

When costs are not paid by the party from whom they are due, the clerk of superior court shall issue an execution for the costs, and attach a bill of costs to each execution. The sheriff shall levy the execution as in other cases.

History.

R.C., c. 102, s. 24; Code, s. 3762; Rev., s. 1252; C.S., s. 1228; 1969, c. 44, s. 17; 1971, c. 269, s. 2.

§§ 6-5,
6-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-7.
Clerk to enter costs in case file.

The clerk of superior court shall enter in the case file, after judgment, the costs allowed by law.

History.

Code, s. 532; Rev., s. 1255; C.S., s. 1231; 1971, c. 269, s. 3.

§§ 6-8 through 6-12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.